District of Columbia statutes.
33-203.04

Repealed

Person erroneously believing himself or herself a limited partner.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 304, 34 DCR 6856
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(y), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-434.